lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid

+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oeoez11§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez12e§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§OEOE1oe§ §OEOEoe§ §oeoez211§
§OEOE4a§ §oeoeadjoe§ §JPJ§ 
§oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§ §oeoezoe§ §oeoez2oe§

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnumszeres; ! optional article prefix
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnumszeres; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry
                        Prefnum; ! empty string entry
                        Prefnumszeres; ! empty string entry
                        Prefigekoto; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:észre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:előre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:félre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:felül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:körül   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:közre   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:külön   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:utána   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:végig   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:össze   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:által   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alul   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:haza   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újra   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:abba   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:neki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:bele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:benn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:szét   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tele   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:tova   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:meg   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:oda   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:elő   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:túl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:alá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:föl   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ide   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:fel   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:rá   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:ki   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:le   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:el   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:át   Adj3igek;
+Pref+:be   Adj3igek;
            Adj3igek;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmincad       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:trillió       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billiárd       Adj2num; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj2num; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefnumszeres
+Pref+:tizen       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszon       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billió       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:trillió       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billiárd       Adj3numszeres; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj3numszeres; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Adj3numszeres
egyszeres AddAdjI;
kétszeres AddAdjI;
kétszeres AddAdjat;
négyszeres AddAdjI;
hétszeres AddAdjI;
hétszeres AddAdjat;
kilencszeres AddAdjI;
kettőszörös AddAdjI;
ötszörös AddAdjI;
háromszoros AddAdjI;
hatszoros AddAdjI;
hatszoros AddAdjat;
nyolcszoros AddAdjI;

LEXICON AddAdjastalanmely
0:ástalan AddAdj;
0:ótlan AddAdj;

LEXICON AddAdjastalanmagas
0:éstelen AddAdj;
0:őtlen AddAdj;

LEXICON AddAdjnemzet
0:0  AddAdj;
0:barát AddAdj;
0:ellenes AddAdjat;
0:gyűlölő AddAdji;

LEXICON AddAdjnemzet1
0:barát AddAdj;
0:ellenes AddAdjat;
0:gyűlölő AddAdji;


!
! al only with these

LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam111;

LEXICON Adj3igek
alaposít AddAdjastalanmely;
anyátlanod AddAdjastalanmely;
baldachinosít AddAdjastalanmely;
betegít AddAdjastalanmagas;
bocsánatosít AddAdjastalanmely;
bolsevistátlan AddAdj;
borzong AddAdjastalanmely;
bátortalankod AddAdjastalanmely;
büdösít AddAdjastalanmagas;
családiaskod AddAdjastalanmely;
cseleked AddAdjastalanmagas;
csibészked AddAdjastalanmagas;
csontosod AddAdjastalanmely;
dacolástalan AddAdj;
degenerálód AddAdjastalanmely;
dekadensked AddAdjastalanmagas;
dogmatikuskod AddAdjastalanmely;
díjmentesed AddAdjastalanmagas;
egocentrikusod AddAdjastalanmely;
egyedít AddAdjastalanmagas;
egértelenít AddAdjastalanmagas;
engedetlenít AddAdjastalanmagas;
extrahálástalan AddAdj;
faired AddAdjastalanmagas;
fajtalankod AddAdjastalanmely;
fertelmesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
fodorít AddAdjastalanmely;
forratlankod AddAdjastalanmely;
földszintesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
gabalyod AddAdjastalanmely;
galambbúgástalan AddAdj;
gyakorlód AddAdjastalanmely;
gyermektelenít AddAdjastalanmagas;
halasztód AddAdjastalanmely;
hatályosít AddAdjastalanmely;
helyesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
historizálástalan AddAdj;
homorít AddAdjastalanmely;
hártyásít AddAdjastalanmely;
idétlenked AddAdjastalanmagas;
impozánskod AddAdjastalanmely;
javítatlanod AddAdjastalanmely;
jogképesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
kalyibátlan AddAdj;
kesered AddAdjastalanmagas;
kompenzálatlankod AddAdjastalanmely;
kvarclámpátlan AddAdj;
kényelmetlened AddAdjastalanmagas;
kótyagosod AddAdjastalanmely;
köteked AddAdjastalanmagas;
leskelőd AddAdjastalanmagas;
lédúsít AddAdjastalanmely;
lövőtlen AddAdj;
merevít AddAdjastalanmagas;
morgolód AddAdjastalanmely;
negédesed AddAdjastalanmagas;
nosztalgikuskod AddAdjastalanmely;
nyakoncsípéstelen AddAdj;
népesed AddAdjastalanmagas;
oxigéndúsod AddAdjastalanmely;
perzselőd AddAdjastalanmagas;
porhadástalan AddAdj;
potrohoskod AddAdjastalanmely;
reggeled AddAdjastalanmagas;
reprezentatívod AddAdjastalanmely;
részecskétlen AddAdj;
részidősít AddAdjastalanmagas;
sematikusod AddAdjastalanmely;
siketít AddAdjastalanmagas;
szappanosít AddAdjastalanmely;
személytelened AddAdjastalanmagas;
szeszesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
szombatistátlan AddAdj;
számolatlanod AddAdjastalanmely;
szőkít AddAdjastalanmagas;
terhelőd AddAdjastalanmagas;
tetterősüléstelen AddAdj;
tisztálkod AddAdjastalanmely;
táratlanod AddAdjastalanmely;
töketlened AddAdjastalanmagas;
tősgyökeresked AddAdjastalanmagas;
vesebajosít AddAdjastalanmely;
veteményezéstelen AddAdj;
viv AddAdjastalanmagas;
zegzugosít AddAdjastalanmely;
zörrentet AddAdjastalanmagas;
éltetéstelen AddAdj;
értesít AddAdjastalanmagas;
öngyilkosít AddAdjastalanmely;
örömtelenít AddAdjastalanmagas;
LEXICON Adj
ainu AddAdjnemzet1;
alaprajztalan AddAdj;
albán AddAdjnemzet;
amhara AddAdjnemzet1;
arab AddAdjnemzet;
avar AddAdjnemzet;
balkánitlan AddAdj;
baszk AddAdjnemzet;
belga AddAdjnemzet1;
besenyő AddAdjnemzet1;
bosnyák AddAdjnemzet;
burját AddAdjnemzet;
bájtalan AddAdj;
cigány AddAdjnemzet1;
cseh AddAdjnemzet;
csillésgyerektelen AddAdj;
dakota AddAdjnemzet1;
dalmát AddAdjnemzet;
diákságtalan AddAdj;
dán AddAdjnemzet;
epszilontalan AddAdj;
eszperente AddAdjnemzet1;
filodendrontalan AddAdj;
finn AddAdjnemzet;
flamand AddAdjnemzet;
francia AddAdjnemzet1;
fárszi AddAdjnemzet1;
füstölőszertelen AddAdj;
grúz AddAdjnemzet;
gyötrelemtelen AddAdj;
görög AddAdjnemzet1;
henyélőtlen AddAdj;
holland AddAdjnemzet;
hun AddAdjnemzet;
idegdúctalan AddAdj;
iker AddAdj;
japán AddAdjnemzet;
jászkuntalan AddAdj;
kalmük AddAdjnemzet;
kecsua AddAdjnemzet1;
kelta AddAdjnemzet1;
kikötőhídtalan AddAdj;
kirgiz AddAdjnemzet;
komi AddAdjnemzet1;
krampampulitlan AddAdj;
kun AddAdjnemzet;
közhatalomtalan AddAdj;
lapp AddAdjnemzet;
lengyel AddAdjnemzet;
lovári AddAdjnemzet1;
magyar AddAdjnemzet;
malajálam AddAdjnemzet;
maszáj AddAdjnemzet;
mikológustalan AddAdj;
mór AddAdjnemzet;
német AddAdjnemzet;
olajfestménytelen AddAdj;
oláh AddAdjnemzet;
osztják AddAdjnemzet;
perzsa AddAdjnemzet;
portugál AddAdjnemzet;
pun AddAdjnemzet;
pártatlan AddAdj;
roma AddAdjnemzet1;
spanyol AddAdjnemzet;
stabilizációtlan AddAdj;
szanszkrit AddAdjnemzet;
szittya AddAdjnemzet1;
szkíta AddAdjnemzet1;
szláv AddAdjnemzet;
szuahéli AddAdjnemzet1;
sántikálótlan AddAdj;
toszkán AddAdjnemzet;
törhetetlen AddAdj;
türkmén AddAdjnemzet;
urdu AddAdjnemzet1;
vallon AddAdjnemzet;
zsidó AddAdjnemzet1;
zsákvászontalan AddAdj;
zulu AddAdjnemzet1;
ír AddAdjnemzet;
örmény AddAdjnemzet1;
üzbég AddAdjnemzet1;
